District of Columbia statutes.
29-311.11

Notice of intent to demand payment and consequences of voting or consenting.

(a)

If a corporate action specified in § 29-311.02(a) is submitted to a vote at a shareholders’ meeting, a shareholder that wishes to assert appraisal rights with respect to any class or series of shares shall:

(1)

Deliver to the corporation, before the vote is taken, written notice of the shareholder’s intent to demand payment if the proposed action is effectuated; and

(2)

Not vote, or cause or permit to be voted, any shares of such class or series in favor of the proposed action.

(b)

If a corporate action specified in § 29-311.02(a) is to be approved by less than unanimous written consent, a shareholder that wishes to assert appraisal rights with respect to any class or series of shares shall not sign a consent in favor of the proposed action with respect to that class or series of shares.

(c)

A shareholder that fails to satisfy the requirements of subsection (a) or (b) of this section shall not be entitled to payment under this subchapter.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(c)(27), 59 DCR 13171

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-311.12.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “sign” for “execute” in (b).

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.